Mississippi statutes. Title 77. Public Utilities and Carriers
Railroad Police Officers

§ 77-9-501.
Short title.

Sections 77-9-501 through 77-9-517 shall be cited as “The Mississippi Railroad Police Law of 1976.”

HISTORY:
Laws, 1976, ch. 441, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 1976.

§ 77-9-503.
Definitions.

For purposes of Sections 77-9-501 through 77-9-517, unless the context requires otherwise, the following terms shall have the meanings ascribed herein:

“Railroad” means a common carrier by railroad.

“Qualified person” means a person who:

has met all the educational and training requirements for railroad police in this state which shall be approved by the Mississippi Law Enforcement Training Academy; and

is of good moral character and has not been convicted of any crime involving moral turpitude.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1976, ch. 441, § 2, eff from and after July 1, 1976.

§ 77-9-505.
Appointment of officers; oath; identification; exercise of powers of arrest and right to bear firearms.

Upon request by the chief police officer of any railroad located wholly or partially within this state, the Commissioner of Public Safety may appoint and commission as a railroad police officer any qualified person named by such chief police officer; provided, however, that the Commissioner of Public Safety may refuse to appoint or may rescind the appointment of anyone. Any such railroad police officer so appointed shall at all times be answerable and responsible to the Commissioner of Public Safety.

A railroad police officer appointed and commissioned as provided in subsection (1) of this section shall, before entering upon his duties as such officer, take the oath of office prescribed by Section 268, Mississippi Constitution of 1890, which shall be endorsed upon his commission. The commission, with the oath endorsed upon it, shall be recorded in the office of the Commissioner of Public Safety.

A railroad police officer appointed and commissioned pursuant to the provisions of Sections 77-9-501 through 77-9-517 shall, while engaged in the performance of his duties, carry on his person a badge identifying him as a police officer of the railroad and an identification card issued by the railroad and countersigned by the Commissioner of Public Safety. When in uniform each such railroad police officer shall wear his badge in plain view.

A railroad policeman may exercise the same powers of arrest and the right to bear firearms that may be exercised by any state, municipal or other police officer in this state, but only with respect to offenses committed against property owned by or in the possession of the railroad or against any person arising out of an offense committed against said railroad on railroad property, or against any employee of the railroad engaged in the performance of his duties. Railroad property for the purposes of Sections 77-9-501 through 77-9-517 shall be construed to mean only property owned by or in possession of the railroad on railroad rights-of-way or switching yards. Any right granted under this subsection in no way relieves the requirements of appropriate affidavit and warrant for arrest from the appropriate jurisdiction and authority pursuant to the laws of this state.

Any person who is trained as a railroad police officer at the Mississippi Law Enforcement Training Academy shall be required to pay at least an amount equal to the per student cost of operation of said academy as tuition.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1976, ch. 441, § 3; Laws, 1988, ch. 339, eff from and after July 1, 1988.

§ 77-9-507.
Handling of persons arrested by officers.

A person arrested by a railroad police officer shall be forthwith taken to the sheriff of the county in which the offense was committed. Such person arrested shall then be handled or processed and accorded the same treatment as persons arrested by any other police officer of this state. After the delivery of the arrested person to the sheriff, the railroad police officer shall have no further authority as to the custody or prosecution of such arrested person.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1976, ch. 441, § 4, eff from and after July 1, 1976.

§ 77-9-509.
Liability of railroad for acts of officer; indemnification.

The railroad by the act of requesting the appointment of any such railroad police officer shall be liable and responsible for all acts of such policeman while he is acting or purporting to act under the provisions of Sections 77-9-501 through 77-9-517 whether such action be authorized by said sections or not; further the railroad shall indemnify the State of Mississippi, the commissioner of public safety and any sheriff for any loss, costs, or expenses incurred by virtue of any act, deed, or omission committed by any such policeman while he is acting or purporting to act under the provisions of Sections 77-9-501 through 77-9-517 whether such act, deed, or omission is authorized by said sections or not.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1976, ch. 441, § 5, eff from and after July 1, 1976.

§ 77-9-511.
Powers of officers appointed and commissioned in other states.

The governor of this state may enter into agreement with the governor of any other state empowering qualified persons, as defined in Section 77-9-503(b), who are railroad police officers appointed and commissioned in either state, to exercise their powers and authority as defined in Sections 77-9-501 through 77-9-517 in the other state.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1976, ch. 441, § 6, eff from and after July 1, 1976.

§ 77-9-513.
Fee for commission; bond; “hold harmless” provision.

Each railroad policeman commissioned under Sections 77-9-501 through 77-9-517 shall pay to the commissioner of public safety a fee of twenty dollars ($20.00) for the issuance of such commission, and shall file a bond in the sum of fifty thousand dollars ($50,000.00) with the commissioner of public safety, for the lawful and faithful performance of his duties. The cost of the permit and bond shall be borne by the railroad requesting the appointment of such railroad police officer. The filing of such bond shall not relieve any railroad from any civil liability it may otherwise incur in accordance with the provisions of Section 77-9-509. Any railroad requesting and obtaining the appointment and commission of a railroad policeman under the provisions of Sections 77-9-501 through 77-9-517 shall indemnify and hold the State of Mississippi, the commissioner of public safety, and any sheriff executing a written permission as provided herein harmless from any and all liability which any or all of them might otherwise incur for the negligent or unlawful acts of said railroad police officer.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1976, ch. 441, § 7, eff from and after July 1, 1976.

§ 77-9-515.
Termination of powers and authority of officers.

The powers and authority of any railroad police officer, whether appointed or commissioned pursuant to the provisions of Sections 77-9-501 through 77-9-517 or any former law of this state may be terminated at any time by the commissioner of public safety.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1976, ch. 441, § 8, eff from and after July 1, 1976.

§ 77-9-517.
No waiver of sovereign immunity of state.

Nothing contained herein shall be construed to waive the sovereign immunity of the State of Mississippi in whole or in part.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1976, ch. 441, § 9, eff from and after July 1, 1976.